Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-527
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for initial licensure and registration and renewal of licensure and registration under the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 212.